Utah statutes.
59-2-1358.   Foreclosure deemed a cumulative remedy.

The foreclosure may not deprive any county of any other method or means provided for the collection or enforcement of any taxes, but is construed as providing an additional or cumulative remedy for the collection of general taxes levied and assessed against the real estate in the county.

